Missouri, session 2026, SB1766.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:

There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or
items stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever chargeable to the fund designated for the
period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:

Section 20.005. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For distributions to private institutions of higher education for
MoExcels Workforce Development Initiatives recommended by
the Coordinating Board for Higher Education, provided that any
grant awards disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched
on a 50/50 basis provided that such funds shall be matched by
the recipient or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic Impacts
Fund (2463). .................................................$1,892,698

Section 20.010. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development

2
For the purpose of planning and implementing technology updates for
Missouri’s job centers providing statewide services to citizens
and employers and to provide adaptive technology to service
citizens with disabilities and allow for improved virtual delivery
of services
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ...............................................$634
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .............................. 3,244
Total................................................................. $3,878

Section 20.013. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For grants to port authorities, provided that local match be provided in
order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ..........................................$7,628,121

Section 20.014. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For grants to a port authority located in any county with more than
fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen
thousand six hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than two thousand but fewer than three thousand
inhabitants, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ..........................................$2,322,905

Section 20.016. To the Department of Transportation
For the design and environmental study phases for a not-for-profit
organization formed for the purpose of managing, operating,
and maintaining the streetcar as well as planning for future
streetcar extensions located in any city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county, provided that no local match be required
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................. $237,180

Section 20.017. To the Department of Transportation

3
For multimodal infrastructure improvements for a public port authority
in excess of 100 acres located in any city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county, provided that no local match be required
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................$25,069,229

For the construction, renovations, and improvements for a public port
authority located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county,
provided that no local match be required
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .............................. 1,251,325
Total.............................................................$26,320,554

Section 20.025. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For completing HVAC projects for various state department facilities
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ..........................................$7,170,524

Section 20.031. To the Office of Administration
For the planning, design, construction, renovation, upgrades, and
property acquisition for a new state office building located in
any city with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer
than fourteen thousand inhabitants, and located in a county with
more than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand
inhabitants, and with a county seat with more than ten thousand
but fewer than twelve thousand six hundred inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$5,306,465

Section 20.032. To the Office of Administration
For the planning, design, construction, renovation, upgrades, and
property acquisition for a fleet management office building and
fleet garage in any county with more than seventy thousand but
fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$7,601,500

Section 20.033. To the Office of Administration

4
For the planning, design, construction, renovation, upgrades, and
property acquisition for a new statewide warehouse in any
county with more than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty
thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$5,524,238

Section 20.037. To the Office of Administration
For the expansion of a sports training facility of a nonprofit
organization for athletes with special needs in a city with more
than forty thousand but fewer than fifty-one thousand
inhabitants and partially located in a county with more than
seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$3,000,000

Section 20.039. To the Office of Administration
For the construction and programming costs for an early childhood
career education program in a county with a population of over
thirty-one thousand but no more than thirty-five thousand, with
a county seat of a population over ten thousand but no more
than thirteen thousand, provided that a local match of ten
percent be provided
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,941,410

Section 20.046. To the Lieutenant Governor
For agri-tourism road sign cost-share grants, provided that no local
match be required
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $492,090

Section 20.055. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For broadband cellular towers, with priority to underserved and
unserved locations
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). .........................................$15,511,913

Section 20.065. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For community development and revitalization, provided that local
match be provided in order to be eligible for state funds

5
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). .........................................$49,857,157

Section 20.070. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For grants to political subdivisions, including but not limited to levee
districts, for an Industrial Site Development Program, provided
that local match be provided in order to be eligible for state
funds
For projects one thousand (1,000) or more contiguous acres in size
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ..........................................$6,000,244

For projects under one thousand (1,000) contiguous acres in size
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ....................................... 12,394,502
Total.............................................................$18,394,746

Section 20.090. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For workforce development
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). .........................................$14,977,095

Section 20.100. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For local tourism development, provided that any grant awards
disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50
basis provided that such funds shall be matched by the recipient
or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). .........................................$15,345,466

Section 20.110. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans’ Commission
For renovations, HVAC upgrades, dietary upgrades, construction, and
replacements at the St. James Veterans’ Home
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$7,832,634

Section 20.111. To the Department of Public Safety

6
For the Missouri Veterans’ Commission
For planning, design, construction, renovations, and upgrades at the
Cape Girardeau Veterans’ Home
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$11,946,472

Section 20.115. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For compiling, standardizing, and maintaining Geographic Information
System (GIS) data in support of the statewide implementation
of Next Generation 911 (NG911) and enhancements, provided
that local matching funds must be provided on a 90/10
state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ..........................................$2,104,988

Section 20.120. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For a sub-system addition to the Missouri Statewide Interoperability
Network (MOSWIN), increasing user capacity and portable
radio communication coverage throughout Jefferson City, and
extending into Cole and Callaway Counties
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ........................................... $947,819

Section 20.125. To the Office of Administration
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For expenses of any state agency responding to COVID-19
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). .........................................$15,580,624

Section 20.135. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For the planning, design, construction, and equipping of a crime
laboratory as part of a multi-agency laboratory campus
including building space, laboratory space, fixtures, equipment,
systems furniture, and parking infrastructure
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). .........................................$56,554,468



Section 20.150. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For grants to emergency medical providers, fire protection entities, or
public safety officers, provided that local matching funds must
be provided
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ..........................................$5,120,883

Section 20.165. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For design, renovation, construction, and improvements to become
compliant with Americans with Disabilities Act standards in
cottages and group homes
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ..........................................$4,437,393

Section 20.176. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For the renovation and accessibility for housing and care for HIV/AIDS
patients in a city not within a county, provided that local
matching must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ........................................... $603,607

Section 20.185. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For grants to federally qualified health centers, certified community
behavioral health organizations, and community mental health
centers, provided that any grant awards disbursed from this
appropriation shall be matched on a 60/40 state/local basis for
projects under five million dollars ($5,000,000) and a 50/50
basis by the recipient for projects over five million dollars
($5,000,000)
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). .........................................$37,538,346

Section 20.197. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services

8
For the upgrades to outdated MRI & Ultrasound equipment in a
hospital in a city with more than sixteen thousand but fewer
than eighteen thousand inhabitants and partially located in a
county with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than forty
thousand inhabitants, provided that local matching funds must
be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$1,131,896

Section 20.198. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For surgical equipment for the hospital located in a county with more
than fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen
thousand six hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than three thousand six hundred but fewer than four
thousand two hundred ten inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................. $500,000

Section 20.199. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For grants to ambulance services, for equipment, radios, or training,
provided that the maximum award shall be $100,000 per
recipient, and further provided that local matching funds must
be provided on a 90/10 state/local basis; and for a statewide
communications and patient movement platform
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ........................................... $100,187

Section 20.205. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For providers of Medicaid services in rural counties for the purchase of
necessary equipment and training for the purpose of increasing
access to telehealth services for MO HealthNet participants
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ..........................................$1,712,640

Section 20.218. To the Office of Administration
To the Department of Elementary and
Secondary Education

9
For Cape Girardeau Career and Technology Center, for equipment and
structural improvements, provided that any grant awards
disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50
basis provided that such funds shall be matched by the recipient
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).............................................................. $611,955


Section 20.300. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For investments in waste water improvements, including costs related
to the connection of statewide facilities to municipal sewer
systems
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462).......................................................$2,572,153

Section 20.310. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For a covered arena and stormwater projects at the Missouri State
Fairgrounds
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462)......................................................$10,264,257

Section 20.314. To the Department of Agriculture
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and land acquisition for
a new maintenance building at the Missouri State Fair
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................. $550,805

Section 20.315. To the Department of Agriculture
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and land acquisition for
an arena at the Missouri State Fair
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................$24,431,662

Section 20.325. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure grants and lead service-line inventories,
provided that local match be provided in order to be eligible for
state funds
Personal Service....................................................$102

10
Expense and Equipment...................................... 286,971,719
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462).....................................................$286,971,821

Section 20.326. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For the testing, filtration, and remediation of lead in drinking water
sources within buildings housing early childhood, elementary,
and secondary education programs which receive state funding
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). .........................................$17,637,974

Section 20.330. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For state park and historic site water and wastewater improvements
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462)......................................................$16,640,206

Section 20.335. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For the Missouri Hydrology Information Center
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ $4,825

Personal Service................................................. 299,355
Expense and Equipment...................................... 5,075,517
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462)........................................................5,374,872
Total..............................................................$5,379,697

Section 20.336. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For maintenance, repair, and capital improvements for sewer updates
for a nursing facility located in any county with more than six
thousand but fewer than seven thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than four hundred but fewer than one
thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ $4,315


11
Section 20.360. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Conservation
For levee setback and road relocation at Columbia Bottom
Conservation Area
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609). ............................$9,746,040

Section 20.361. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure projects in a city with more than forty-six
thousand but fewer than fifty-one thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 70/30
state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462)........................................................ $898,399

Section 20.362. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure projects in a city with more than fourteen
thousand but fewer than sixteen thousand inhabitants and that is
the county seat of a county with more than one hundred twenty
thousand but fewer than one hundred fifty thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 70/30
state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462)........................................................ $108,699

Section 20.363. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure projects in a city with more than fifty-one
thousand but fewer than fifty-eight thousand inhabitants and
located in more than one county, provided that local matching
funds must be provided on a 70/30 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462).......................................................$4,958,000

Section 20.364. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For water and wastewater infrastructure projects in any city with more
than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand

12
inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more
than forty thousand but fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 70/30
state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462)........................................................ $351,304

Section 20.370. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For broadband infrastructure
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Broadband Fund (2465)............$16,817,596
From Coronavirus Capital Projects Fund (2431)......................... 94,547,528
Total............................................................$111,365,124

Section 20.371. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For reimbursement to broadband providers, for certain costs incurred
for state broadband projects to remove, install, or replace utility
poles, where such costs are necessary to extend the provider’s
retail broadband services offering speeds of 100/100 Mbps to an
area currently lacking broadband speeds of 25/3 Mbps,
excluding providers that have a pre-existing and enforceable
federal or state funding commitment for the same location,
provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 20.370
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Broadband Fund (2465).............$5,525,211

Section 20.375. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For broadband capacity building
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $10,208

Personal Service................................................. 975,905
Expense and Equipment...................................... 5,248,684
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Broadband Fund (2465).......... 6,224,589
Total..............................................................$6,234,797

Section 20.376. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development

13
For the planning, design and construction of a parking garage located in
a city with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty-one
thousand inhabitants and partially located in a county with more
than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty thousand
inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$2,000,000

Section 20.378. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the planning, design and construction of a community facility
located in a city with more than one thousand nine hundred but
fewer than two thousand one hundred fifty inhabitants and
located in a county with more than twenty-two thousand but
fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than one thousand nine hundred but fewer than
two thousand three hundred inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$1,583,470

Section 20.379. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the upgrades and renovations to a theater that is located in a village
with more than fifty-two but fewer than sixty-one inhabitants
and located in a county with more than twenty-two thousand but
fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer
than sixteen thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................... $11,580

Section 20.381. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For an entertainment district working towards stimulating the growth,
community spirit and entertainment of the district located in any
city with more than four thousand inhabitants and located in
more than one county, while promoting the historic character,
provided that no local match be required
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,000,000

Section 20.390. To the Office of Administration

14
For the Department of Public Safety and the Department of the
National Guard
For planning, design, construction and capital improvements to replace
water and sanitation lines, connections to municipal wastewater
treatment facilities, and establishing water and wastewater
service
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462).......................................................$1,242,988

Section 20.400. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for the installation of additional broadband
capacity within state correctional centers
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Broadband Fund (2465).............. $965,819

Section 20.405. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for water storage, water delivery, wastewater
systems, and storm water systems at facilities statewide
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462)......................................................... $86,913

Section 20.500. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For distributions to providers of vocational education programs,
provided that twenty-five percent (25%) local matching funds
be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$4,626,589

Section 20.505. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For agriculture innovation and workforce program grants to higher
education institutions
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$1,669,617


15
Section 20.506. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For capital improvements to a facility housing an organization in a city
not within a county which facilitates supplemental education
programs including education, job development and training,
and community service programs to under-resourced
individuals
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)........................................................ $851,817

Section 20.508. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the University of Missouri-Columbia for construction, renovation,
and maintenance and repair needs for NextGen
Radiopharmaceuticals, Animal Science, Healthcare,
Engineering, Student Success and directly related academic
assets and infrastructure including related planning, design,
demolition, acquisitions, project management, equipment, and
start-up costs
From Board of Public Building Bond Proceeds Series A 2026 Fund. ..........$20,000,000

Section 20.510. To the Office of Administration
For digital government transformation of the State of Missouri
information technology systems, provided that not more than
twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility in F.T.E. is allowed from
this section to Section 5.030 of House Bill No. 2005, as truly
agreed to and finally passed by the 102nd General Assembly,
Second Regular Session
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $79,088

Personal Service................................................6,866,283
Expense and Equipment...................................... 5,703,744
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................12,570,027
Total.............................................................$12,649,115

Section 20.520. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture

16
For the purpose of replacing the Missouri Department of Agriculture’s
Grain Regulatory Services licensing system
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)........................................................ $129,144

Section 20.525. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the purpose of modernizing the Missouri Department of Social
Services' Missouri Automated Child Support System
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $14,660

Personal Service................................................1,312,534
Expense and Equipment...................................... 13,043,126
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................14,355,660
Total.............................................................$14,370,320

Section 20.560. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For build-out of the Public Safety Broadband Network (PSBN) in
Jefferson City to increase wireless broadband coverage and
capacity in and around the buildings of the Capitol Complex
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$4,995,848

Section 20.570. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For an additional zone controller in order to reduce load and increase
capacity of the Missouri Statewide Interoperability Network
(MOSWIN)
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)........................................................ $738,715

Section 20.572. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For funding of training on proper use-of-force, de-escalation, and
constitutional policing provided by a basic training center or a
continuing law enforcement education training provider

17
licensed by the Director of Public Safety. Such training shall be
made available to all Missouri law enforcement officers
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)........................................................ $916,399

Section 20.576. To the Department of the National Guard
For the Department of Public Safety
For the planning, design, and construction of an Aviation Classification
Repair Activity Depot (AVCRAD) aircraft maintenance hangar
addition at an AVCRAD Base in any city with more than one
hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants, provided that no local match be required
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190)...............................$3,800,000

Section 20.580. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, and improvements to institutional
security cameras, camera systems, and associated hardware and
software
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$2,293,835

Section 20.585. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Corrections
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, and improvements to institutional
radios, radio systems, and associated hardware and software
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)......................................................... $73,195

Section 20.600. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
To procure and implement a multi-year, vendor-hosted,
integrated commercial off the shelf electronic health record
system for use in all of the department’s hospitals and facilities
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................$14,256,363
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).................................................... 564,672

18
Total.............................................................$14,821,035

Section 20.601. To the Department of Mental Health
For the Division of Behavioral Health
For the construction of four new Behavioral Health Crisis Centers in
areas of need as determined by the Department of Mental
Health
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $114,708

Section 20.603. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For the planning, design and construction of an inpatient children’s
acute psychiatric hospital located at a residential treatment
facility in a county with more than one million inhabitants
operated by a non-profit entity that currently operates or is part
of a health system that operates acute/inpatient children’s
psychiatric hospitals and psychiatric residential treatment
facilities with extensive experience in trauma-informed care and
adapting the latest neuroscience to treatment, offering youth full
medical, psychiatric, clinical, and educational services,
provided that local matching funds must be provided on a 50/50
state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$3,388,611

Section 20.606. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For distribution to a nonprofit organization with capacity to shelter at
least 140 individuals in a city with more than one hundred sixty
thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants, for
design, planning, and construction of buildings to provide
housing and workforce training for the homeless, including but
not limited to recently released inmates of the Missouri
Department of Corrections, and office space for administration
and delivery of wrap around services related thereto, provided
that no local match be required
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................$10,263,897

Section 20.610. To the Office of Administration

19
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the design and construction of a multi-agency health laboratory
campus, including additional building space, laboratory space,
fixtures, equipment, systems furniture, and parking
infrastructure, provided no funds shall be expended to the
World Health Organization
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)......................................................$40,167,501

Section 20.612. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the construction of a warehouse facility to a residential treatment
center facilitating youth to independent living in a city with
more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two
hundred thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................. $292,855

Section 20.625. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the development of a case management system
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$2,967,722

Section 20.643. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For capital improvement projects at a justice center located in a city
with more than fifty-one thousand but fewer than fifty-eight
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county,
provided that any grant awards disbursed from this
appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50 basis by the recipient
or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)........................................................ $145,297

Section 20.645. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For capital improvement projects at an airport located in a county with
more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two

20
thousand three hundred but fewer than four thousand
inhabitants, provided that any grant awards disbursed from this
appropriation shall be matched on a 90/10 basis by the recipient
or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)........................................................ $453,501

Section 20.650. To the Office of Administration
For the Supreme Court
For funding court improvement projects
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)........................................................ $335,719

Section 20.705. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For East Central College for the construction and/or renovation needs
for a Rolla Campus including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$3,250,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ....................................... 2,971,784
Total..............................................................$6,221,784

Section 20.720. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Mineral Area College for the construction and/or renovation needs
for a Center for Excellence including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $323,095

Section 20.725. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Moberly Area Community College for a Next Century Networking
project across the five-campus system to include the
construction and/or renovation needs for the network including
related planning, design, acquisitions, project management,
equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $572,250

Section 20.736. To the Office of Administration

21
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Ozarks Technical Community College
For the construction and/or renovation needs for a Center for
Workforce and Student Success, including related planning,
design, acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-
up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$25,741,709

Section 20.740. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For St. Charles Community College
For the construction and/or renovation needs for a workforce technical
innovation and transformation campus including related
planning, design, acquisitions, project management, equipment,
and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$3,843,809

Section 20.746. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For St. Louis Community College
For construction and/or renovation needs for education and workforce
training programs for the Wildwood Campus expansion,
including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,617,247

Section 20.760. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For State Technical College of Missouri
For the construction and/or renovation needs for multiple technical
programs for overall student capacity expansions including
related planning, design, acquisitions, project management,
equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$10,000,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ....................................... 2,630,413
Total.............................................................$12,630,413

Section 20.765. To the Office of Administration

22
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For University of Central Missouri
For the deferred maintenance, construction and/or renovation needs for
the Humphreys Building including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From Board of Public Building Bond Proceeds Series A 2026 Fund. ...........$9,950,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ....................................... 4,939,283
Total.............................................................$14,889,283

Section 20.770. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Southeast Missouri State University
For the demolition, construction, and/or renovation needs for a dual
role, multi-use, multi-facility comprehensive development
including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, fixtures, equipment, systems furniture, and start-
up costs, provided that any grant awards disbursed from this
appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50 basis by the recipient
for project costs up to sixty million ($60,000,000); and further
provided project costs over sixty million ($60,000,000) shall be
matched on a 25/75 basis by the recipient
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)......................................................... $84,452

Section 20.771. For the Department of Higher Education and
Workforce Development
For Southeast Missouri State University
For the demolition, construction, and/or renovation needs for a dual-
role, multi-use, multi-facility comprehensive development,
including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, fixtures, equipment, systems furniture, and start-
up costs for a Modern Campus Health Sciences Building
From Board of Public Building Bond Proceeds Series A 2026 Fund. ..........$37,000,000

Section 20.775. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Missouri State University

23
For the construction and/or renovation needs for a Center for
Transformational Education for Life, Physical, and Health
Sciences including related planning, design, acquisitions,
project management, equipment, and start-up costs, provided
that any grant awards disbursed from this appropriation shall be
matched on a 50/50 basis by the recipient
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$13,137,484
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ....................................... 4,979,731
Total.............................................................$18,117,215

Section 20.776. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Missouri State University
For the demolition, construction and/or renovation needs for the Judith
Enyeart Reynolds Complex, including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up
costs, provided that any grant awards disbursed from this
appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50 basis by the recipient
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$13,778,965

Section 20.780. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Lincoln University
For the construction and/or renovation needs for health sciences and
crisis center including related planning design, acquisitions,
project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From Board of Public Building Bond Proceeds Series A 2026 Fund. ..........$10,000,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ....................................... 21,679,894
Total.............................................................$31,679,894

Section 20.785. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Truman State University
For the demolition of McKinney Center and the construction and/or
renovation needs for the Kirk Student Access and Success
Center including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, equipment, and start-up costs


From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
10(2464)................................................................$1,099,234


Section 20.786. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Truman State University
For multi-location HVAC system improvements including related
planning, design, project management, equipment, and
construction costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101)................................ $164,134


Section 20.790. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Northwest Missouri State University
For the construction and/or renovation needs for Martindale Hall and
related health and allied sciences education program expansions
and campus renovations including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up
costs, provided that any grant awards disbursed from this
appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50 basis by the recipient
for project costs up to sixty million ($60,000,000); and further
provided project costs over sixty million ($60,000,000) shall be
matched on a 25/75 basis by the recipient
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$2,315,791

Section 20.791. For the Department of Higher Education and
Workforce Development
For Northwest Missouri State University
For the construction and/or renovation needs for an Energy
Infrastructure Modernization project including related planning,
design, acquisitions, project management,

equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$33,693,780



25
Section 20.795. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Missouri Southern State University
For the construction and/or renovation needs for the Health Science
Innovation Center including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$3,016,897

Section 20.801. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Missouri Western State University
For construction and/or renovation needs for the student success hub at
the Hearnes Center including related planning, design, project
management, equipment, and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $202,060

Section 20.805. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Harris-Stowe State University
For the construction and/or renovation needs for a STEM Academic
Building including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management,
equipment, and start-up costs
From Board of Public Building Bond Proceeds Series A 2026 Fund. ...........$7,750,000
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ....................................... 20,020,018
Total.............................................................$27,770,018


Section 20.820. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For Missouri University of Science and Technology
For the construction and/or renovation needs for Missouri Protoplex
including related planning, design, acquisitions, project
management, equipment and start-up costs, provided that any
grant awards disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched
on a 50/50 basis by the recipient for project costs up to sixty
million ($60,000,000); and further provided project costs over


sixty million ($60,000,000) shall be matched on a 25/75 basis
by the recipient
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)......................................................$12,512,584

Section 20.821. For the Department of Higher Education and
Workforce Development
For the University of Missouri
For the construction and/or renovation of an Advancing Missouri’s
STEM Education and Workforce Development, including
related planning, design, acquisitions, project management,
equipment, and start-up costs located at the Missouri University
of Science and Technology
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$39,512,218

Section 20.822. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the planning, design, and construction of an engineering building at
the University of Missouri - St. Louis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)......................................................$13,927,520

Section 20.825. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the University of Missouri-Kansas City
For the construction and/or renovation needs for a Health Sciences
District Development including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management, equipment and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$36,537,603

Section 20.830. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the University of Missouri-St. Louis
For the demolition, construction and/or renovation needs for a Campus
of the Future through a multi-facility comprehensive effort
including related planning, design,
acquisitions, project management,
equipment and start-up costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101)..............................$28,228,828




Section 20.833. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For providing a matching grant to a county with more than one million
inhabitants to establish a regional intelligence and information
center, a property control facility, and a training facility and
range for law enforcement, provided that any grant award
disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched on a 50/50
basis provided that such funds shall be matched by the recipient
or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$5,495,405

Section 20.834. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For the Agriculture Business Development Division
For the Agriculture and Small Business Development Authority, for
biofuel infrastructure projects
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$3,566,173

Section 20.836. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For the acquisition, construction, maintenance, repair and/or renovation
of a building to provide advanced workforce development for a
school district located in any city with more than four thousand
four hundred but fewer than four thousand nine hundred
inhabitants and located in a county with more than one hundred
thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four thousand
but fewer than six thousand inhabitants for a technical school,
provided that no local match be provided in order to be eligible
for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)......................................................$26,166,497

Section 20.840. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety

28
For the construction of a building that will provide a regional training
facility for law enforcement and fire department personnel,
located in any city with more than three thousand but fewer than
three thousand four hundred inhabitants and located in a county
with more than fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than
seventeen thousand six hundred inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than three thousand but fewer than three
thousand six hundred inhabitants, provided no local match be
required
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)........................................................ $532,802

Section 20.841. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For airport repairs and improvements, located in any city with more
than three thousand but fewer than three thousand four hundred
inhabitants and located in a county with more than fifteen
thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six
hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three
thousand but fewer than three thousand six hundred inhabitants,
provided that local match be provided in order to be eligible for
state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)........................................................ $433,349

Section 20.843. To the Office of Administration
For the Lieutenant Governor
For the planning, design, maintenance, or construction for a library
located in any city with more than six thousand three hundred
but fewer than seven thousand inhabitants and located in a
county with more than two hundred thousand but fewer than
two hundred thirty thousand inhabitants, provided that local
match be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)......................................................... $58,265

Section 20.844. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development

29
For a local government for the clean-up and preparation for
development for a site comprising over one hundred and forty
(140) acres which has been abandoned for at least ten years in a
county with more than one million inhabitants, provided that
any grant awards disbursed from this appropriation shall be
matched on a 50/50 basis provided that such funds shall be
matched by the recipient or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)........................................................ $247,453

Section 20.848. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
For the planning, design, maintenance, or construction of an agency
that connects job seekers to training programs and employment,
helping employers diversify their workforce, and assisting
youth with career skills located in any county with more than
one million inhabitants, provided that local match be provided
in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$3,651,910

Section 20.849. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, maintenance, or construction of an Amtrak
Station located in any city with more than three thousand four
hundred but fewer than three thousand eight hundred
inhabitants and located in a county with more than eight
thousand but fewer than eight thousand nine hundred
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three
thousand three hundred but fewer than five thousand
inhabitants, provided no local match be required
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)........................................................ $953,455

Section 20.852. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the maintenance and improvements of a park and sports complex
located on approximately one hundred twenty-seven acres in
any city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer


than two hundred thousand inhabitants, provided that local
match be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$4,728,030

Section 20.853. To the Office of Administration
For the Lieutenant Governor
For maintenance and improvements of a library district that serves any
county with more than two hundred sixty thousand but fewer
than three hundred thousand inhabitants and any city with more
than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred
thousand inhabitants, provided that local match be provided in
order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)........................................................ $465,511

Section 20.855. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the planning, design, maintenance, or construction of a nonprofit
social services agency located in any city with more than one
hundred twenty-five thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty
thousand inhabitants that assists residents who are experiencing
hardships by providing resources for basic and emergency
needs in aide to overcome hardships and maintain self-
sufficiency, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ..........................................$1,318,799

Section 20.857. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the purpose of removing condemned city-owned, vacant properties
in any city not within a county, provided that local match be
provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$9,373,068

Section 20.864. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety


For maintenance and improvements for county jails, provided that any
grant awards disbursed from this appropriation shall be matched
on a 50/50 basis provided that such funds shall be matched by
the recipient or local entity
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$2,944,442

Section 20.865. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For the purchase of services, equipment, or supplies for a nonprofit
organization located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county to
help reduce community victimization and strengthen police
services through violence reduction strategies and provided that
a local match, to include personnel costs associated with project
initiatives, to be provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$2,418,566

Section 20.867. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For the purpose of a non-profit organization to acquire a building that
will provide housing units to a center that works to end
homelessness in any county with more than one million
inhabitants, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)......................................................... $91,000

Section 20.873. To the Office of Administration
For the Lieutenant Governor
For maintenance, repairs, expansion and improvements for the official
Korean War veteran’s memorial located in any city with more
than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than
one county, provided that local match be provided in order to be
eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)........................................................ $561,604


32
Section 20.874. To the Office of Administration
For the Lieutenant Governor
For the planning, design, maintenance, or construction for a library
located in any city with more than eighteen thousand but fewer
than twenty thousand inhabitants and located in a county with
more than two hundred sixty thousand but fewer than three
hundred thousand inhabitants, provided that local match be
provided in order to be eligible for state funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$1,962,295

Section 20.879. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For a nonprofit organization serving youth for over twenty years that
enables young people to reach their full potential as productive,
caring, responsible citizens by providing a club experience,
including after school and summer programs that assures
success located in a city with more than twenty thousand but
fewer than twenty-three thousand inhabitants and that is the
county seat of a county with more than forty thousand but fewer
than fifty thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$1,000,000

Section 20.881. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For distribution to any county with more than four hundred thousand
but fewer than five hundred thousand inhabitants, for storm
water mitigation and remediation, provided that local matching
funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462)........................................................ $303,648

Section 20.883. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For the planning, design, maintenance or construction of a flood wall
located in any city with more than eleven thousand but fewer
than twelve thousand five hundred inhabitants and located in a
county with more than one million inhabitants, provided that


local matching funds must be provided on a 70/30 state/local
basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462).......................................................$3,829,797

Section 20.886. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For upgrades and maintenance to sewer systems located in any city
with more than ninety-five thousand but fewer than one hundred
five thousand inhabitants, provided that local matching funds
must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462).......................................................$7,245,509

Section 20.890. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for water storage, water delivery, waste water
systems and storm water systems located in any city with more
than six thousand three hundred but fewer than seven thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than two hundred
thousand but fewer than two hundred thirty thousand
inhabitants, provided that no local match be required
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462).......................................................$1,000,000

Section 20.891. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For planning, design, construction, maintenance, repair, and capital
improvements for water storage, water delivery, waste water
systems and storm water systems located in any city with more
than eleven thousand but fewer than twelve thousand five
hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with
more than one hundred thousand but fewer than one hundred
twenty thousand inhabitants, provided that local matching funds
must be provided on a 90/10 state/local basis
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Water Infrastructure Fund
(2462)........................................................ $900,000


34
Section 20.900. To the Office of Administration
For administration of programs appropriated herein
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $17,339

Personal Service................................................1,203,790
Expense and Equipment...................................... 234,658
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ...........................................1,438,448

For the Department of Natural Resources administration of programs
appropriated herein
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................... 4,704

Personal Service................................................. 437,333
Expense and Equipment...................................... 199,831
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)......................................................... 637,164

For the Department of Economic Development administration of
programs appropriated herein
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 17,082

Personal Service................................................1,560,890
Expense and Equipment...................................... 230,178
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ...........................................1,791,068

For the Department of Public Safety administration of programs
appropriated herein

Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................... 2,020

Personal Service................................................. 202,022
Expense and Equipment...................................... 42,022
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).................................................... 244,044

35
Total..............................................................$4,151,869

Section 20.905. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury between
various Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds. .........................$150,000,000

Section 20.906. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery – Revenue Replacement
Fund
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ........................................$230,000,000

Section 20.910. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For the Transit Program
For a capital subsidy for eligible transit agencies supporting the
transportation of the elderly, individuals with disabilities, and
low-income individuals
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464).......................................................$3,588,165

Section 20.912. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, design, construction,
reconstruction, rehabilitation and repair of I-35, I-29, and U.S.
169 in Clay, Jackson, and Platte counties, matched by federal
funds
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................$29,694,836

Section 20.930. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For the Division of Plant Industries
For renovations and improvements to the Feed Control Laboratory
Expense and Equipment
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)........................................................ $258,853

Section 20.980. To the Office of Administration


For the Department of Public Safety
For Highway Patrol aircraft maintenance and training
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $94,978
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644).......... 94,978
Total............................................................... $189,956

Section 20.992. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For a grant to a nonprofit organization serving multiple counties, at
least one of which is a county with more than one million
inhabitants for the construction of a regional police training
facility
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................$50,000,000

Section 20.994. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For a grant program to upgrade the streetlights in a city with more than
twenty thousand but fewer than twenty-three thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than two hundred
thousand but fewer than two hundred thirty thousand
inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................. $300,000

Section 20.997. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For distribution to a county with more than seventeen thousand six
hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer than ten
thousand inhabitants, for the planning, design, and construction
of a veterans' memorial, provided that local matching funds
must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$3,500,000

Section 20.1020. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
For the purpose of maintenance and repairs at a water treatment plant
located in any city with more than two thousand seven hundred
but fewer than three thousand inhabitants and located in a
county with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer


than fourteen thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than five thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Health and Economic
Impacts Fund (2463). ........................................... $373,206

Section 20.1028. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For the Foundation Formula
For distributions to the free public schools of $4,681,264,449 in total
from this section and Section 2.015 of House Bill No. 2002, as
truly agreed to and finally passed by the 103rd General
Assembly, Second Regular Session, under the School
Foundation Program as provided in Chapter 163, RSMo,
provided that no funds are used to support the distribution or
sharing of any individually identifiable student data for non-
educational purposes, marketing or advertising, as follows:
For the Foundation Formula
Program Distribution
From Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery - Revenue Replacement Fund
(2464)...........................................................$150,000,000


Section 20.1090. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, design, and
construction of infrastructure improvements on Highway 76 in a
city with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer
than fourteen thousand inhabitants and located in a county with
more than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than one thousand
but fewer than four thousand inhabitants
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................$4,168,345

Section 20.1121. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure projects in any county with more than thirty
thousand but fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than nine thousand but fewer than
thirteen thousand inhabitants


From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $750,000

Section 20.1122. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For a public agency governed by a 12-member appointed board with
the mission to make the St. Louis region a more vibrant place to
live, work and play by developing a regional network of
greenways, provided that no local match be required
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,051,343

Section 20.1178. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For a nonprofit corporation focused on greater downtown community
development in a city with more than four hundred thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county established by
a membership organization representing business, nonprofit
organizations, and other investors for the purpose of
undertaking community development projects
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................$15,000,000

Section 20.1179. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For the planning, design, renovation and construction of a parking
garage and convention center located in a city with more than
forty thousand but fewer than fifty-one thousand inhabitants and
partially located in a county with more than seventy thousand
but fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$20,000,000

Section 20.1332. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For a nonprofit agency located in a city with more than twelve
thousand five hundred but fewer than fourteen thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than fifty
thousand but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than twelve thousand six hundred but
fewer than fifteen thousand inhabitants, that provides pregnancy
testing, resources and education to make informed decisions
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). ................................... $14,698
(cid:252)